Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12.2 Rhode Island Infrastructure Bank
46-12.2-10.
Powers of local governmental units.

Notwithstanding any provision of general law, special law or municipal charter to the contrary:

In addition to authority granted otherwise by this chapter and in any bond act or other law, a local governmental unit, acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, or other body authorized by law, if any, or otherwise the chief executive officer, shall have the power to:

Issue local governmental obligations as provided herein: (A) if and to the amount authorized by a bond act; (B) without limitation as to the amount, if issued as limited obligations, pursuant to §

46-12.2-12

or §

46-12.2-12.1

; or (C) without limitation as to the amount, if issued as a financing lease or other appropriation obligation;

Plan, design, acquire, construct, operate, maintain, and otherwise undertake any project subject to the rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines of the department, if applicable, in effect from time to time and the requirements of any other applicable law;

Apply for, accept, and expend, financial assistance and grants for the purpose of financing costs of projects subject to the rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines of the agency and the department, if applicable, in effect from time to time, the provisions of the applicable loan agreement, and the requirements of other applicable law;

Authorize, execute, deliver, and comply with loan agreements, trust agreements, grant agreements, financing leases, appropriation agreements, and other agreements, and instruments with the agency, the department, and other persons relating to financial assistance and grants hereunder, and the issue of local governmental obligations to evidence loans, and perform the same;

Receive, apply, pledge, assign, and grant security interests in its general revenues and wastewater system revenues to secure its obligations under local governmental obligations and other financial assistance; and

Fix, revise, charge, and collect such fees, rates, rents, assessments, and other charges of general or special application for the costs and/or use of any approved project, any wastewater system and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive wastewater system revenues, or for the services provided thereby, as it shall deem necessary to meet its obligations under any loan agreement or local governmental obligations outstanding or otherwise to provide for the costs and/or operation of the project and any wastewater system.

In order to provide for the collection and enforcement of fees, rates, rents, assessments, and other charges for the operation of any approved project, any wastewater system, and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental units may derive wastewater system revenues, in addition to any other authority provided by law or any bond act applicable to a particular local governmental unit, local governmental units are hereby granted all the powers and privileges granted to them by the general laws of the state with respect to any similar fee, rate, rent, assessment, or other charge. All unpaid fees, rates, rents, assessments, and other charges shall be a lien upon the real estate served for which the unpaid fees, rates, rents, assessments, or other charges have been made. A lien shall arise and attach as of the due date of each unpaid fee, rate, rent, assessment, or other charge. Subject to the provisions of §

39-26.5-6

, the lien shall be superior to any other lien other than a tax lien, encumbrance, or interest in the real estate, whether by way of mortgage, attachment, or otherwise, except easements and restrictions. In the case of a life estate, the interest of the tenant for life shall first be liable for the unpaid fees, rates, rents, assessments, or other charges. The local governmental unit may enforce the lien by advertising and selling any real estate liable for unpaid fees, rents, assessments, and other charges in the manner provided for the enforcement of liens for unpaid taxes by chapter 9 of title 44, as amended from time to time.

Any city or town and any other local governmental unit acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, other body authorized by law, or otherwise the chief executive officer, may enter into agreements with the agency or the department, if applicable, regarding the operation of a pricing system adopted under any applicable law for the services provided by any approved project, the wastewater system of which it is a part, and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive wastewater system revenues. The agreements may include, without limitation, provisions defining the costs of services, the approved project, and the wastewater system and other facilities, and covenants or agreements, regarding the fixing and collection of fees, rates, rents, assessments and other charges for the costs and the maintenance of the pricing system at levels sufficient to pay or provide for all the costs and any payments due the agency under any loan agreement or local governmental obligations.

Any city or town and any other local governmental unit acting by and through the officer or officers, board, committee, or other body authorized by law, or otherwise the chief executive officer, may enter into agreements with the agency and the department, if applicable, regarding the operation of an enterprise fund established for any approved project, any wastewater system, and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive wastewater system revenues. The agreements may include, without limitation, fiscal and accounting controls and procedures, provisions regarding the custody, safeguarding, and investment of revenues, and other amounts credited thereto, the establishment of reserves and other accounts and funds, and the application of any surplus funds.

The provisions of any charter, other laws or ordinances, general, special, or local, or of any rule or regulation of the state or any municipality, restricting or regulating in any manner the power of any municipality to lease (as lessee or lessor) or sell property, real, personal, or mixed, shall not apply to leases and sales made with the agency pursuant to this chapter.

Any municipality, notwithstanding any contrary provision of any charter, other laws or ordinances, general, special or local, or of any rule or regulations of the state or any municipality, is authorized and empowered to lend, pledge, grant, convey to, or lease from the agency, at its request, upon terms and conditions that the chief executive officer, if any, or where no chief executive officer exists, the city or town council of the municipality, may deem reasonable and fair and without the necessity for any advertisement, order of court, or other action or formality, any real property or personal property which may be necessary or convenient to effectuation of the authorized purpose of the agency, including other real property already devoted to public use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-11.
Authority of local governmental units to issue obligations — Terms.

In addition to the powers of any local governmental unit provided in any bond act, whenever a local governmental unit has applied for and accepted a loan from the agency and entered into a loan agreement therefor, any local governmental obligations issued by the local governmental unit to evidence the loan may be issued in accordance with, and subject to the limitations of this chapter, notwithstanding the provisions of the bond act authorizing the obligation or any other general or special law or provision of municipal charter to the contrary. The provisions of this chapter shall apply to the issuance of local governmental obligations under authority of any bond act heretofore enacted and under authority of any bond act hereafter enacted unless the bond act expressly provides that the provisions of this chapter shall not so apply. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no local governmental obligation issued as a general obligation bond shall be issued unless authorized by a vote of the body or bodies required by the charter, ordinances, or laws governing the local governmental unit, or the applicable bond act for the authorization of indebtedness of the local governmental unit.

Local governmental obligations issued by any local governmental unit shall be dated, may bear interest at such rate or rates, including rates variable, from time to time, subject to such minimum or maximum rate, if any, as may be determined by such index or other method of determination provided in the applicable loan agreement, shall mature in such amount or amounts and at such time or times, not later than the maximum dates, if any, provided herein, and may be made redeemable in whole or in part before maturity at the option of the local governmental unit or at the option of the agency, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed in the loan agreement prior to the issue of the local governmental obligations. Local governmental obligations may be issued as serial bonds or term bonds or any combination thereof with such provision, if any, for sinking funds for the payment of bonds as the local governmental unit and the agency may agree. The local governmental obligations may be sold at private sale and may be in such form, payable to the bearer thereof or the registered owner, whether certificated or uncertificated, be in such denominations, payable at such place or places, within or without the state, and otherwise bear such terms and conditions, not inconsistent with this chapter, as provided in the applicable loan agreement or as the agency and the local governmental unit shall otherwise agree. The local governmental obligations may be issued in principal amount equal to the loan evidenced thereby or at such discount as the agency and the local governmental unit shall agree.

Local governmental obligations shall be payable within a period not exceeding the greater of the period, if any, specified in the applicable bond act or the useful life of the approved project financed by such obligations as determined by the department, or, if incurred to finance more than one project, the average useful life of the projects. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the local governmental obligations shall be payable by such equal, increasing, or decreasing installments of principal, annual or otherwise, as will extinguish the obligations at maturity, the first installment to be payable no later than three (3) years after the date of issuance of the obligations or one year after the date of completion of the approved project financed by the obligations, as determined by the department, whichever date is later, and the remaining installments of principal, if any, to be in such amounts and payable on such dates as the agency and the local governmental unit shall agree.

If a local governmental unit has authorized borrowing in accordance with this chapter and the issuance of local governmental obligations to evidence the borrowing under any bond act, the local governmental unit may, subject to the applicable loan agreement and with the approval of the agency, issue notes to the agency to evidence the loan. The issuance of the notes shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of bonds other than notes, to the extent applicable, provided the maturity date of the notes shall not exceed five (5) years from the date of issue of the notes. Notes issued for less than the maximum maturity date may be renewed by the issue of other notes maturing no later than the maximum maturity date.

A local governmental unit may issue local governmental obligations to refund or pay at maturity or earlier redemption any local governmental obligations outstanding under any loan agreement, or to refund or pay any other debt of the local governmental unit issued to finance the approved project to which the loan agreement pertains. The refunding local governmental obligations may be issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide for the principal of the obligations refunded, any redemption premium thereon, any interest accrued and to accrue to the date of payment of the obligations, the costs of issuance of the refunding obligations and any reserves required by the applicable loan agreement. The issue of refunding local governmental obligations, the amount and dates of maturity or maturities and other details thereof, the security therefor, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the local governmental unit in respect to the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of local governmental obligations other than refunding obligations as this chapter may be applicable.

Except as otherwise provided in §

46-12.2-12

and §

46-12.2-12.1

, the applicable bond act, or by agreement between the agency and a local governmental unit, all local governmental obligations issued in accordance with this section shall be general obligations of the local governmental unit issuing the obligations for which its full faith and credit are pledged and for the payment of which all taxable property in the local governmental unit shall be subject to ad valorem taxation without limit as to rate or amount except as otherwise provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-12.
Power of local governmental units to issue limited obligations payable from wastewater system revenues.

If required by the applicable loan agreement, and notwithstanding any general or special law or municipal charter to the contrary, local governmental obligations shall be issued as limited obligations payable solely from wastewater system revenues pledged to their payment in accordance with §

46-12.2-13

. If required by the applicable loan agreement, local governmental obligations issued in accordance with this section shall also be general obligations of the local governmental unit and secured by a pledge of its full faith and credit. Notwithstanding §

45-12-2

or any general or special law or municipal charter to the contrary, all local governmental units shall have the power to issue local governmental obligations payable solely from wastewater system revenues pursuant to this section without limit as to amount, and the amount of principal and premium, if any, and interest on the obligations shall not be included in the computation of any limit on the indebtedness of the local governmental unit or on the total taxes which may be levied or assessed by the local governmental unit in any year or on any assessment, levy, or other charge made by the local governmental unit on any other political subdivision or instrumentality of the state. This chapter shall constitute the bond act for the issuance of the local governmental obligations payable solely from wastewater system revenues by local governmental units. Any local governmental obligations issued in accordance with this section that is payable solely from wastewater system revenues shall recite on its face that it is a limited obligation payable solely from wastewater system revenues pledged to its payment.

The issue of local governmental obligations in accordance with this section, the maturity or maturities and other terms thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the local governmental unit in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of local governmental obligations to the extent applicable and not inconsistent with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2.

46-12.2-12.1.
Power of local governmental units to issue limited obligations payable from energy efficiency savings.

If required by the applicable loan agreement, and notwithstanding any general or special law or municipal charter to the contrary, local governmental obligations shall be issued as limited obligations payable solely from an appropriation of general revenues in an amount not to exceed the projected energy savings of the project. Notwithstanding §

45-12-2

or any general or special law or municipal charter to the contrary, all local governmental units shall have the power to issue such local governmental obligations pursuant to this section without limit as to amount, and the amount of principal and premium, if any, and interest on the obligations shall not be included in the computation of any limit on the indebtedness of the local governmental unit or on the total taxes which may be levied or assessed by the local governmental unit in any year or on any assessment, levy, or other charge made by the local governmental unit on any other political subdivision or instrumentality of the state. This section shall constitute the bond act for the issuance of such local governmental obligations by local governmental units. Any local governmental obligations issued in accordance with this section shall recite on its face that it is a limited obligation payable solely from an appropriation of general revenues in an amount not to exceed the projected energy savings pledged to its payment.

The issuance of local governmental obligations in accordance with this section, the maturity or maturities and other terms thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligation of the local governmental unit in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of local governmental obligations to the extent applicable and not inconsistent with this section.

A local government unit may appropriate general revenues on an annual basis to pay any local governmental obligation provided that an event of non-appropriation shall not be an event of default under any local governmental obligation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 18; P.L. 2021, ch. 395, § 17, effective July 14, 2021.

46-12.2-13.
Trust agreements pertaining to local governmental obligations.

Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, local governmental obligations issued in accordance with this chapter may be secured by one or more trust agreements, including, or in addition to the applicable loan agreement, between the local governmental unit and a corporate trustee, which may be a trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state, or directly between the agency and the local governmental unit. Any trust agreement shall be in such form and shall be executed as provided in the applicable loan agreement or as otherwise agreed to between the agency and the local governmental unit.

Any trust agreement directly or indirectly securing local governmental obligations may, in addition to other security provided by law, pledge or assign, and create security interests in, all or any part of the general revenues of the local governmental unit. Any trust agreement may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights, security, and remedies of the agency, or other holders of the local governmental obligations, as may be determined by the agency including, without limitation, provisions defining defaults and providing for remedies in the event thereof, which may include the acceleration of maturities to the extent permitted by law, and covenants setting forth the duties of, and limitations on, the local governmental unit in relation to the custody, safeguarding, investment, and application of moneys, including general revenues and wastewater system revenues, the issue of additional and refunding local governmental obligations and other bonds, notes, or obligations on a parity or superior thereto, the establishment of reserves, the establishment of sinking funds for the payment of local governmental obligations, and the use of surplus proceeds of local governmental obligations. A trust agreement securing local governmental obligations issued in accordance with §

46-12.2-12

may also include covenants and provisions not in violation of law regarding the acquisition, construction, operation, and carrying out of the approved project financed by the local governmental obligations, the wastewater system of which it is a part, and any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive wastewater system revenues or other general revenues, the fixing and collection of wastewater system revenues or other general revenues, and the making and amending of contracts relating thereto.

In addition to other security provided herein or otherwise by law, any local governmental obligations issued under authority of this chapter may be secured, in whole or in part, by insurance or by letters or lines of credit or other credit facilities issued by any insurance company, bank, trust company, or other financial institution, within or without the state, and a local governmental unit may pledge subject to applicable voter approval requirements, assign, or appropriate any of its general revenues or wastewater system revenues, as appropriate, as security for the reimbursement to the issuers of insurance, letters, or lines of credit or other credit facilities of any payments made thereunder.

Any trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the agency or other holders of the local governmental obligations secured thereby and of any trustee or other fiduciary thereunder.

In addition to any other remedies provided under the applicable loan agreement or otherwise by law, the agency and any other holder of local governmental obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter, and any trustee under any trust agreement securing the obligations may bring suit in the superior court upon the local governmental obligations, and may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding for legal or equitable relief, including, in the case of local governmental obligations issued in accordance with §

46-12.2-12

, proceedings for the appointment of a receiver to take possession and control of the approved project financed thereby, the wastewater system of which it is a part, or any other revenue producing facilities from which the local governmental unit may derive wastewater system revenues or other general revenues, to operate and maintain the system or facility in compliance with law, to make any necessary repairs, renewals, and replacements and to fix, revise, and collect wastewater system revenues, protect, and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted in this chapter or under any trust agreement, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter, the loan agreement, the applicable bond act, or the trust agreement to be performed by the local governmental unit or any officer thereof.

A pledge of general revenues or wastewater system revenues in accordance with this chapter shall constitute a sufficient appropriation thereof for the purposes of any provision for appropriation for so long as the pledge shall be in effect, and, notwithstanding any general or special law or municipal charter to the contrary, the revenues shall be applied as required by the pledge and the trust agreement evidencing the revenues without further appropriation.

A pledge or assignment of general revenues, other than wastewater system revenues, may be made only to secure general obligations of a local governmental unit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-14.
Bonds of the agency.

The agency may provide by resolution of the board of directors for the issuance, from time to time, of bonds of the agency for any of its corporate purposes, including those set forth in this chapter and chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39, or for the borrowing of money in anticipation of the issuance of the bonds. Bonds issued by the agency may be issued as general obligations of the agency or as special obligations payable solely from particular revenues or funds as may be provided for in any trust agreement or other agreement securing bonds. The agency may also provide by resolution of the board of directors for the issuance, from time to time, of temporary notes in anticipation of the revenues to be collected or received by the agency, including, without limitation, in anticipation of any payments to the agency from the state pursuant to §

46-12.2-7

, or in anticipation of the receipt of other grants or aid. The issue of notes shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter and chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39, as applicable, relating to the issue of bonds of the agency other than temporary notes as these chapters may be applicable; provided, however, that notes issued in anticipation of revenues shall mature no later than one year from their respective dates, or the date of expected receipt of the revenues, if later, and notes issued in anticipation of grants, or other aid and renewals thereof, shall mature no later than six (6) months after the expected date of receipt of the grant or aid.

The bonds of each issue shall be dated, may bear interest at such rate or rates, including rates variable from time to time as determined by such index, banker’s loan rate, or other method determined by the agency, and shall mature or otherwise be payable at such time or times, as may be determined by the agency, and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the agency or the holder thereof at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the agency. The agency shall determine the form of bonds, and the manner of execution of the bonds, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds, and the place or places of payment of principal, redemption premium, if any, and interest, which may be paid at any bank or trust company within or without the state. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds shall cease to be the officer before the delivery thereof, the signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if the officer had remained in office until delivery. The agency may provide for authentication of bonds by a trustee, fiscal agent, registrar, or transfer agency. Bonds may be issued in bearer or in registered form, or both, and, if notes, may be made payable to the bearer or to order, as the agency may determine. The agency may also establish and maintain a system of registration for any bonds whereby the name of the registered owner, the rights evidenced by the bonds, the transfer of the bonds, and the rights and other similar matters, are recorded in books or other records maintained by or on behalf of the agency, and no instrument evidencing the bond or rights need be delivered to the registered owner by the agency. A copy of the books or other records of the agency pertaining to any bond registered under a registration system certified by an authorized officer of the agency or by the agent of the agency maintaining the system shall be admissible in any proceeding without further authentication. The board of directors may by resolution delegate to any member or officer of the agency, or any combination thereof, the power to determine any of the matters set forth in this section. In the discretion of the agency, bonds of the agency may be issued with such terms as will cause the interest thereon to be subject to federal income taxation. The agency may sell its bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, for the price, at the rate or rates of interest, or at discount in lieu of interest, as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24, as applicable.

The agency may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, exchangeable for definitive bonds, when the bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The agency may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall have become mutilated or shall have been destroyed or lost. The agency, by itself or through such agency as it may select, may purchase and invite offers to tender for purchase any bonds of the agency at any time outstanding; provided, however, that no purchase by the agency shall be made at a price, exclusive of accrued interest, if any, exceeding the principal amount thereof or, if greater, the redemption price of the bonds when next redeemable at the option of the agency, and may resell any bonds so purchased in such manner and for such price as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter or chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39, as applicable.

In the discretion of the board of directors, any bonds issued under this section may be secured by a trust agreement in such form and executed in such manner as may be determined by the board of directors, between the agency and the purchasers or holders of the bonds, or between the agency and a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state. The trust agreement may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, any loan agreements, local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations, and the revenues, funds, and other assets or property held or to be received by the agency, including without limitation all moneys and investments on deposit from time to time in the water pollution control revolving fund, the Rhode Island water pollution control revolving fund, and the local interest subsidy trust fund, or the municipal road and bridge revolving fund, as applicable, and any contract or other rights to receive the same, whether then existing or thereafter coming into existence and whether then held or thereafter acquired by the agency, and the proceeds thereof. The trust agreement may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights, security, and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, provisions defining defaults and providing for remedies in the event thereof which may include the acceleration of maturities, restrictions on the individual right of action by bondholders, and covenants setting forth the duties of and limitations on the agency in relation to the custody, safeguarding, investment, and application of moneys, the enforcement of loan agreements, local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations, the issue of additional or refunding bonds, the fixing, revision, charging, and collection of charges, the use of any surplus bond proceeds, the establishment of reserves, and the making and amending of contracts.

In the discretion of the board of directors, any bonds issued under authority of this chapter or chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39 may be issued by the agency in the form of lines of credit or other banking arrangements under terms and conditions, not inconsistent with this chapter or chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39, and under such agreements with the purchasers or makers thereof or any agent or other representative of such purchasers or makers, as the board of directors may determine to be in the best interests of the agency. In addition to other security provided herein or otherwise by law, bonds issued by the agency under any provision of this chapter or chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39 may be secured, in whole or in part, by financial guarantees, by insurance, or by letters or lines of credit issued to the agency or a trustee or any other person, by any bank, trust company, insurance or surety company, or other financial institution, within or without the state, and the agency may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, any loan agreements, local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations, and the revenues, funds, and other assets and property held or to be received by the agency, and any contract or other rights to receive the same, whether then existing or thereafter coming into existence and whether then held or thereafter acquired by the agency, and the proceeds thereof, as security for the guarantees or insurance or for the reimbursement by the agency to any issuer of the line or letter of credit.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company to act as a depository or trustee of the proceeds of bonds, revenues, or other moneys under a trust agreement of the agency, and to furnish indemnification and to provide security as may be required by the agency. It is hereby declared that any pledge or assignment made by the agency under this chapter or chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39 is an exercise of the governmental powers of the agency, and loan agreements, local governmental obligations and non-governmental obligations, revenues, funds, assets, property, and contract or other rights to receive the same and the proceeds thereof, which are subject to the lien of a pledge or assignment created under this chapter or chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39, shall not be applied to any purposes not permitted by the pledge or assignment.

Any holder of a bond issued by the agency under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39 and any trustee or other representative under a trust agreement securing the trustee or representative, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by the trust agreement, may bring suit upon the bonds in the superior court and may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding for legal or equitable relief, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted hereunder or under the trust agreement, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this chapter, chapter 19.16 of title 23, chapter 18 of title 24, and chapter 26.5 of title 39, or by the trust agreement, to be performed by the agency or by any officer thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.

46-12.2-14.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 18; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 480, § 5, effective October 13, 2017.

46-12.2-15.
Refunding bonds.

The agency may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying any of its bonds, issued pursuant to this chapter or chapter 24-18, at or prior to maturity or upon acceleration or redemption or purchase and retirement. Refunding bonds may be issued at such times at or prior to the maturity, redemption, or purchase and retirement of the refunded bonds as the board of directors deems to be in the interest of the agency. Refunding bonds may be issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide for payment of the principal of the bonds being refunded, together with any redemption premium thereon, any interest or discount accrued or to accrue to the date of payment of the bonds, the costs of issuance of the refunding bonds, the expenses of paying, redeeming, or purchasing the bonds being refunded, the costs of holding and investing proceeds of refunding bonds pending payment, redemption, or purchase and reserves for debt service or other expenses from the proceeds of refunding bonds as may be required by a trust agreement securing the bonds. Pending application, the proceeds of the refunding bonds may be placed in escrow. The issue and sale of refunding bonds, the maturities, and other details thereof, the security therefor, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the agency in respect of the same shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter and chapter 24-18, as applicable, relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as these chapters may be applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2.

46-12.2-16.
Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued by the agency under this chapter or chapter 24-18 and local governmental obligations issued hereunder are hereby made securities in which all public officers and agencies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies in their commercial departments, savings banks, cooperative banks, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds and local governmental obligations are hereby made securities which may properly be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer of any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the state or any political subdivision is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2.

46-12.2-17.
No additional consent required.

Except as provided in this section, bonds and local governmental obligations, and non-governmental obligations may be issued under this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24 without obtaining the consent of any executive office, department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state or any political subdivision thereof, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any condition, or acts other than those proceedings, conditions, or acts which are specifically required therefor hereunder or under any applicable bond act, and the validity of and security for any bonds issued by the agency pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24, and any local governmental obligations, and non-governmental obligations issued in accordance herewith, shall not be affected by the existence or nonexistence of any consent or other proceedings, conditions, or acts. Nothing in this chapter or chapter 18 of title 24 shall exempt the agency from the provisions of chapter 10.1 of title 42 entitled “Public Finance Management Board,” and the Narragansett Bay commission shall not issue any bonds, notes, or other indebtedness without the approval of the division of public utilities as required by §

39-3-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 303, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 20, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 14, § 17.